Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2719
Loan fund program; qualifying business; documentation required.

At the time when a qualifying business makes application to a city to participate in a loan fund program, the qualifying business shall provide to the city appropriate documentation evidencing its negotiations with one or more primary lenders and the terms upon which it has received or will receive the portion of the total financing for its activities which will not be provided by the city.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 20.